Washington statutes.
RCW 18.227.100

State medicaid program—Coverage.

The health care authority shall take any steps which are necessary and proper to ensure that the services of behavioral health support specialists are covered under the state medicaid program by January 1, 2025.

[ 2023 c 270 s 11.]